Massachusetts, session 194th, S2133.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 7 of chapter 78 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking
the third sentence.
SECTION 2. Said chapter 78 is hereby amended by inserting after section 7 the following
section:-
Section 7A.
That part of the records of a public library which reveals the identity and intellectual
pursuits of a person using such library shall not be a public record as defined by clause Twenty-
sixth of section seven of chapter four. Access to such part of such library records shall be granted
only with a warrant issued pursuant to chapter 276 or under exigent circumstances.
of 1